Maine, session 132, LD1463.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 5 MRSA §1813, sub-§6, as amended by PL 2005, c. 386, Pt. H, §8, is further
amended to read:
6. Surplus property. Providing for transfer of supplies, materials and equipment that
are surplus from one state department or agency to another that may need them, and for the
disposal by private and public sale of supplies, materials and equipment that are obsolete
and unusable. Political subdivisions, educational institutions, fire departments or
qualifying nonprofit organizations as defined in section 1828, subsection 1, must be given
an opportunity to purchase the surplus items through private sale. If 2 or more political
subdivisions, educational institutions, fire departments or qualifying nonprofit
organizations are interested in any item, the sale must be the result of competitive bid. Any
equipment so purchased must be retained for a period of at least one year in a current
ongoing program. Any item purchased by a political subdivision, educational institution,
fire department or qualifying nonprofit organization under this section may not be sold or
transferred by that political subdivision, educational institution, fire department or
qualifying nonprofit organization for a period of 6 months from the date of the private sale,
except that a qualifying nonprofit organization that contracts with the Department of Health
and Human Services to provide vehicles to low-income families may resell a passenger
vehicle or light truck purchased in the private sale to a low-income family to assist it in
participating in work, education or training pursuant to the qualifying nonprofit
organization's contract with the Department of Health and Human Services. The State
reserves the right to refuse to sell additional equipment to a political subdivision,
educational institution, fire department or qualifying nonprofit organization if it is
determined that the political subdivision, educational institution, fire department or
qualifying nonprofit organization has not retained the equipment for the required period of
6 months. This subsection does not apply to firearms as defined by Title 17-A, section 2,
subsection 12-A. Except as provided in section 20-A, subsection 2, all surplus or forfeited
firearms must be destroyed by the State;
Sec. 2. Departments to update rules. The Director of the Bureau of General
Services within the Department of Administrative and Financial Services, with the
approval of the Commissioner of Administrative and Financial Services and the
Commissioner of Public Safety, shall update the rules of the Department of Administrative
and Financial Services and the Department of Public Safety to require that any surplus or
forfeited firearm in the State be destroyed unless it is a firearm that is state property and is
purchased at fair market value by a state employee and was assigned to the employee or
the employee was the principal user of the firearm at the time of that employee's
employment as described in the Maine Revised Statutes, Title 5, section 20-A, subsection
2.
Sec. 3. Contract for destruction of firearms. In accordance with the Maine
Revised Statutes, Title 5, chapter 155, the Department of Public Safety shall contract with
a vendor specializing in the destruction of firearms to destroy all forfeited or surplus
firearms in the State except for surplus firearms purchased pursuant to Title 5, section 20-A,
subsection 2.
Page 1 - 132LR2278(01)